New Jersey, session 222, S1012.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 6 of P.L.1991, c.452 (C.39:3-10.31) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.         The Chief Administrator of the Motor Vehicle Commission may waive the written law and knowledge and road test portion of the examinations required for a motorcycle license or endorsement under R.S.39:3-10 for the holder of an examination permit who has successfully completed a motorcycle safety education course established under the provisions of section 1 of P.L.1991, c.452 (C.27:5F-36). b.    The chief administrator shall waive the motorcycle road test required for a motorcycle license or endorsement under R.S.39:3-10 for any applicant providing documentation upon application of honorable discharge from a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States and successful completion of a Motorcycle Safety Foundation course on any United States military base. (cf: P.L.2011, c.13, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.